src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
ванё:ванё N_МЕРЁ  "hymy" ;
варе:варе N_САВНЕ  "ponnistus" ;
варкадё:варкадё N_МЕРЁ  "karhunnahkoilla koristetut poronvaljaat" ;
варё:варё N_МЕРЁ  "pälvi" ;
выврё:выврё N_МЕРЁ  "vihellys" ;
выркаˮлё:выркаˮлё N_МЕРЁ  "?hihna, joka erottaa reen keskimmäisiä vetohihnoja" ;
выӈоцё:выӈоцё N_МЕРЁ  "aho" ;
едё:едё N_МЕРЁ  "suoli" ;
ендˮ:енд N_ИДЕ/МЯДО  "virta" ;
ендё:ендё N_МЕРЁ  "pingottunut esine" ;
ентё:ентё N_МЕРЁ  "?hihna, joka erottaa reen keskimmäisiä vetohihnoja" ;
есерˮ:есер N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "uudin" ;
идецё:идецё N_МЕРЁ  "vesi (deminutiivi)" ;
идрё:идрё N_МЕРЁ  "piipitys" ;
идрё:идрю N_МЕРЁ  "piipitys" ;
идъе:идъе N_САВНЕ  "väre" ;
иларˮ:илар N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "harhanäky" ;
илерˮ:илер N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "elämä" ;
илирˮ:илир N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "elämäntapa" ;
индˮ:инд N_ИДЕ/МЯДО  "henkäys" ;
иркадё:иркадё N_МЕРЁ  "kirskahdus" ;
ирнё:ирнё N_МЕРЁ  "kitinä" ;
лаˮнарё:лаˮнарё N_МЕРЁ  "natina" ;
лабрё:лабрё N_МЕРЁ  "kahina" ;
лабрё:лабрё N_МЕРЁ  "tuulen kohina" ;
лакадё:лакадё N_МЕРЁ  "näpsäys" ;
лахарё:лахарё N_МЕРЁ  "keskustelu" ;
лекарцо:лекарцё N_МЕРЁ  "lääke" ;
либтˮ:либт N_ИДЕ/МЯДО  "turkissukka" ;
лэмбарё:лэмбарё N_МЕРЁ  "perhonen" ;
лэё:лэё N_МЕРЁ  "liekki" ;
маларё:маларё N_МЕРЁ  "puheen sorina" ;
марˮ:мар N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var  "rauhanen" ;
марˮ:мар N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var  "urosvilliporo" ;
маркадё:маркадё N_МЕРЁ  "ratina" ;
мирˮ:мир N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var  "tavara" ;
мирˮ:мир N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var  "hahmo" ;
морё:морё N_МЕРЁ  "paahde" ;
муё:муё N_МЕРЁ  "tulva" ;
мярё:мярё N_МЕРЁ  "säämiskä" ;
нарё:нарё N_МЕРЁ  "karjunta" ;
нерˮ:нер N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var  "rusto" ;
нерˮ:нер N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var  "valkuainen" ;
нойдё:нойдё N_МЕРЁ  "punaisella verkalla koristettu naisten reki" ;
нюе:нюе N_САВНЕ  "lapsiparka" ;
нюмдерˮ:нюмдер N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "nimitys" ;
няврё:няврё N_МЕРЁ  "hörökorvainen valkoinen koira" ;
падё:падё N_МЕРЁ  "auringon asento horisontin lähellä" ;
паё:паё N_МЕРЁ  "leppä" ;
педˮ:пед N_ТАСО/ТЮСЕ  "etusarvi" ;
педерˮ:педер N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "hupun reuna" ;
пилё:пилё N_МЕРЁ  "paarma" ;
пуˮлё:пуˮлё N_МЕРЁ  "matalalla kulkeva pilvi" ;
пыдё:пыдё N_МЕРЁ  "tihkusade" ;
пырдё:пырдё N_МЕРЁ  "vastakarvaan suunta" ;
пэвдё:пэвдё N_МЕРЁ  "halko" ;
пэдё:пэдё N_МЕРЁ  "väsymys" ;
сабць:сабць N_САБЦЬ  "sylki" ;
савне:савне N_САВНЕ  "harakka" ;
саврю:саврё N_МЕРЁ  "kopsahdus" ;
сахарё:сахарё N_МЕРЁ  "kalke" ;
сеʼ:се N_ИЛЪЕ-Pal/Var  "tuppi" ;
сеˮ:се N_ИДЕ-Pal/Var  "pihka" ;
седˮ:сед N_ТАСО/ТЮСЕ  "poronnahasta pieni peite jolla kapaloidaan lasta" ;
сесарё:сесарё N_МЕРЁ  "kahina" ;
сидерˮ:сидер N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "ikkuna" ;
синдё:синдё N_МЕРЁ  "hetki, jolloin kovasti nukuttaa" ;
сисё:сисё N_МЕРЁ  "vaahto" ;
сыӈгрё:сыӈгрё N_МЕРЁ  "huhu" ;
сюдрё:сюдрё N_МЕРЁ  "vihellys" ;
сянзё:сянзё N_МЕРЁ  "sulatettu rasva poron luista ja sisälmyksistä" ;
сярнё:сярнё N_МЕРЁ  "vikinä" ;
сярцё:сярцё N_МЕРЁ  "läpitunkeva huuto" ;
таˮнё:таˮнё N_МЕРЁ  "letti" ;
танзё:танзё N_МЕРЁ  "huuru" ;
тарецё:тарецё N_МЕРЁ  "lyhyt karva" ;
таё:таё N_МЕРЁ  "koivuntuohesta suojakerros" ;
тойрё:тойрё N_МЕРЁ  "kopina" ;
туё:туё N_МЕРЁ  "vinossa tasapinta" ;
тюˮ:тю N_ТЮСЕ  "merkkipylväs" ;
тюсоцё:тюсоцё N_МЕРЁ  "viehka" ;
хаˮмаре:хаˮмаре N_САВНЕ  "huuhkaja" ;
хабдё:хабдё N_МЕРЁ  "uimarakko" ;
хаерˮ:хаер N_ВАР/МЯДО  "aurinko" ;
халрё:халрё N_МЕРЁ  "pakahduksiin väsyneiden porojen hengityksen ääni" ;
ханебцё:ханебцё N_МЕРЁ  "pöllö" ;
ханьˮ:хань N_ИДЕ/МЯДО  "yöhalla" ;
ханьзяре:ханьзяре N_САВНЕ  "vanne" ;
ханё:ханё N_МЕРЁ  "saalistusväline" ;
хасрё:хасрё N_МЕРЁ  "suostunut järvi" ;
хаце:хаце N_САВНЕ  "häkä" ;
хаӈарё:хаӈарё N_МЕРЁ  "tulen kahina" ;
хойрё:хойрё N_МЕРЁ  "varpusenpoika" ;
хубрё:хубрё N_МЕРЁ  "kaukainen epäselvä ääni" ;
хутрё:хутрё N_МЕРЁ  "jyske" ;
хыврё:хыврё N_МЕРЁ  "vikinä" ;
хыркадё:хыркадё N_МЕРЁ  "kirskuna" ;
хэбирё:хэбирё N_МЕРЁ  "koiran valittava vikinä" ;
юдерˮ:юдер N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "lämpö" ;
юдецё:юдецё N_МЕРЁ  "kymmenluku" ;
ядё:ядё N_МЕРЁ  "kuumuus" ;
яльцедё:яльцедё N_МЕРЁ  "jylinä" ;
ямбё:ямбё N_МЕРЁ  "kylmä ilma, joka tule sisään kun ovi on auki" ;
яндˮ:янд N_ИДЕ/МЯДО  "vuori" ;
ясацё:ясацё N_МЕРЁ  "kekäle" ;
ёрˮ:ёр N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var  "hauskutus" ;
ӈаˮнё:ӈаˮнё N_МЕРЁ  "melu" ;
ӈасрё:ӈасрё N_МЕРЁ  "hiljainen ontto ääni" ;
ӈасё:ӈасё N_МЕРЁ  "melu" ;
ӈэдрё:ӈэдрё N_МЕРЁ  "nouseva ja laskeva ääni" ;
